Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 91.514 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the confirmation of the sale by the court and the expiration of the right
of redemption provided in KRS 91.511, the title to any real estate purchased
from the master commissioner pursuant to KRS 91.481 to 91.527 shall vest in
the purchaser.
(b) The title of the real estate shall be an absolute estate in fee simple, subject to
rights-of-way of public utilities on which tax has been otherwise paid and
subject to any right of redemption of the United States of America[, if any].
(c) All persons, including the Commonwealth of Kentucky, infants,
incompetents, absentees, and nonresidents who may have had any right, title,
interest, claim. or equity of redemption in or to, or lien upon the land shall be
barred of all right, title, interest, claim, lien, or equity of redemption, and the
court shall order that immediate possession of the real estate be given to the
purchaser. Any person so barred shall thereafter have as his or her exclusive
remedy a claim for a share of the proceeds of the sale of the real estate by the
master commissioner.
(2) The title shall be subject to the liens of any tax bill which may have attached to the
parcel of real estate prior to the time of the filing of the petition affecting the parcel
of real estate not then delinquent, or which may have attached after the filing of the
petition and prior to the expiration of the period provided for redemption and not
including any answer to such petition.
(3) If the parcel of real estate is sold to the city or to a land bank authority created
pursuant to KRS 65.350 to 65.375, the title shall be free of any liens to the extent of
the interest of any taxing authority in any such real estate.
(4) The title shall not be subject to the lien of special tax bills which have attached to
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 1/9/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 334
the parcel of real estate but the lien of the special tax bill shall attach to the
proceeds of the master commissioner's sale or to the proceeds of the ultimate sale of
the parcel by the city.
(5) Failure of any party other than the purchaser to follow the procedures set out in
KRS 91.484 to 91.527 shall not affect the vesting of title in the purchaser.
(6) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph, any
purchaser who obtains title to real property under this section, which
had been occupied at any time within the two (2) years prior to the
time the collector of taxes filed the list of unpaid tax bills as required
under KRS 91.484, shall:
a. Begin renovation of the property no later than six (6) months
after obtaining title; and
b. i. Return the property to a state of occupancy no later than
eighteen (18) months after obtaining title; or
ii. If subject to a land bank authority established pursuant to
KRS 65.210 to 65.300 and 65.350 to 65.375, within the
period of time required by the authority for returning the
property to effective utilization for the county in which the
property is located. This date may be extended if the land
bank authority provides a process for an extension of this
time period and a project extension application with all
required documentation has been filed with the appropriate
authority, or other procedural requirements have been met,
and approval of the extension is pending or has been
granted.
2. If the property obtained under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph is
subject to:
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 1/9/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 334
a. An existing lease at the time of sale, the time required for the
purchaser to begin renovation and return the property to a state
of occupancy shall not begin until the end of the lease period,
with the remaining lease period not to exceed eleven (11)
months; or
b. The six (6) month right of redemption under KRS 426.530, the
time required for the purchaser to return the property to a state
of occupancy shall not begin until the end of the redemption
period.
4. Establishing occupancy under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph may
be offered by affidavit of the master commissioner, sheriff, appraiser,
or other person designated by the court.
(b) As used in this subsection, "state of occupancy" means:
1. Actual occupancy of the property by the purchaser or by a lessee
pursuant to a long-term lease or any short-term rental agreement as
may be authorized by local zoning provisions; or
2. Actively marketing the property for sale or rent. As used in this
subparagraph, "actively marketing the property" means:
a. A "for sale" or "for rent" sign has been prominently placed on
the property with accurate contact information;
b. If the owner has engaged the services of a licensed real estate
agent, the agent has complied with the requirements of KRS
324.117; and
c. The owner has continued to make a good-faith effort to sell or
rent the property at a price that reflects the circumstances and
market conditions until rented or sold for immediate occupancy.
(c) Failure to comply with this subsection:
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 1/9/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 334
1. Shall result in a fine in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per
day for each day of violation, payable to the chief financial officer of
the local government in which the property is located; and
2. May result in an order of sale of the property under KRS 426.205.
(d) This subsection shall only apply to residential property located in a county
that has a land bank authority created pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300
and 65.350 to 65.375.
(e) This subsection shall not apply to vacant lots or residential property that is
delipidated or deteriorated to the extent it cannot be returned to a state of
occupancy.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 426 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any purchaser who
obtains title to real property sold under an order or judgment of a court,
other than an execution, by a commissioner or other officer selling the
property, which had been occupied at any time within the two (2) years prior
to the time of the appraisal required under KRS 426.520, shall:
1. Begin renovation of the property no later than six (6) months after
obtaining title; and
2. a. Return the property to a state of occupancy no later than
eighteen (18) months after obtaining title; or
b. If subject to a land bank authority established pursuant to KRS
65.210 to 65.300 and 65.350 to 65.375, within the period of time
required by the authority for returning the property to effective
utilization for the county in which the property is located. This
date may be extended if the land bank authority provides a
process for an extension of this time period and a project
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 1/9/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 334
extension application with all required documentation has been
filed with the appropriate authority, or other procedural
requirements have been met, and approval of the extension is
pending or has been granted.
(b) If the property obtained under paragraph (a) of this subsection is subject to:
1. An existing lease at the time of sale, the time required for the
purchaser to begin renovation and return the property to a state of
occupancy shall not begin until the end of the lease period, with the
remaining lease period not to exceed eleven (11) months; or
2. The six (6) month right of redemption under KRS 426.530, the time
required for the purchaser to return the property to a state of
occupancy shall not begin until the end of the redemption period.
(2) As used in this section, "state of occupancy" means:
(a) Actual occupancy of the property by the purchaser or by a lessee pursuant
to a long-term lease or any short-term rental agreement as may be
authorized by local zoning provisions; or
(b) Actively marketing the property for sale or rent. As used in this paragraph,
"actively marketing the property" means:
1. A "for sale" or "for rent" sign has been prominently placed on the
property with accurate contact information;
2. If the owner has engaged the services of a licensed real estate agent,
the agent has complied with the requirements of KRS 324.117; and
3. The owner has continued to make a good faith effort to sell or rent the
property at a price that reflects the circumstances and market
conditions until rented or sold for immediate occupancy.
(3) Failure to comply with this section:
(a) Shall result in a fine in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per day
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 1/9/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 334
for each day of violation, payable to the chief financial officer of the local
government in which the property is located; and
(b) May result in an order of sale of the property under KRS 426.205.
(4) This section shall only apply to residential property located in a county that has a
land bank authority created pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 and 65.350 to
65.375.
(5) This section shall not apply to vacant lots or residential property that is
delipidated or deteriorated to the extent it cannot be returned to a state of
occupancy.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 1/9/2026 2:18 PM Jacketed